Utah statutes.
23-19-42.   Search and rescue surcharge.
(1)  In addition to the fees imposed under this chapter, there is imposed a 25
cent surcharge on each fishing, hunting, or combination license.
(2)  This surcharge shall be deposited in the General Fund as a dedicated
credit for the Search and Rescue Financial Assistance Program created under
Section 53-2-107.
